California, session 20252026, SB527.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2784.5 is added to the Labor Code, to read:2784.5. (a) Section 2775 and the holding in Dynamex do not apply to the relationship between a sports coach and an elementary or secondary private school or local educational agency if the sports coach position meets all of the conditions described in subdivision (b) and the sports coach does not perform any additional services for the elementary or secondary private school or local educational agency beyond coaching athletic programs. Instead, the determination of employee or independent contractor status for the sports coach shall be governed by Borello.(b) This section shall only apply to a sports coach position that meets all of the following conditions:(1) (A) The position for the sports coach was initially made available to existing credentialed teachers and other educational staff only, and no person meeting either of those criteria accepted the position.(B) If the position is for a head sports coach, the position was initially made available to existing credentialed teachers only, and no person meeting that criterion accepted the position.(2) If the position for the sports coach or head sports coach was not accepted as described in paragraph (1), the position was then made available to the general public and meets all of the following requirements:(A) The position is either on a volunteer basis or by stipend.(B) The position is for the purposes of a specified sport during a specified season.(C) There is no further obligation for employment, wages, or benefits. (b)(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Local educational agency” means any school district, county office of education, charter school, or state special school.(2) “Sports coach” means any natural person on a volunteer basis for, or paid by by, a private school or local educational agency to coach an athletic program.